.config/sublime-text-3/Packages/User/en_ru.aff
SFX 123   хаться шешься       хаться
SFX 123   хаться шется        хаться
SFX 123   хаться шетесь       хаться
SFX 123   хаться шемся        хаться
SFX 123   хать шут          хать
SFX 123   хать шу           хать
SFX 123   хать шешь         хать
SFX 123   хать шете         хать
SFX 123   хать шет          хать
SFX 123   хать шем          хать
SFX 123   еться ятся         [дрт]еться
SFX 123   еться люсь         петься
SFX 123   еться ишься        [дрт]еться
SFX 123   еться ится         [дрт]еться
SFX 123   еться итесь        [дрт]еться
SFX 123   еться имся         [дрт]еться
SFX 123   еться юсь          реться
SFX 123   еть  ят           [дмнпрст]еть
SFX 123   еть  лю           петь
SFX 123   еть  ишь          [дмнпрст]еть
SFX 123   еть  ите          [дмнпрст]еть
SFX 123   еть  ит           [дмнпрст]еть
SFX 123   еть  им           [дмнпрст]еть
SFX 123   еть  ю            реть
SFX 123   есть тут          честь
SFX 123   есть ту           честь
SFX 123   есть тешь         честь
SFX 123   есть тете         честь
SFX 123   есть тет          честь
SFX 123   есть тем          честь
SFX 123   есть тёшь         честь
SFX 123   есть тёте         честь
SFX 123   есть тёт          честь
SFX 123   есть тём          честь
SFX 123   есть ядут         сесть
SFX 123   есть яду          сесть
SFX 123   есть ядешь        сесть
SFX 123   есть ядете        сесть
SFX 123   есть ядет         сесть
SFX 123   есть ядем         сесть
SFX 123   деться жусь         деться
SFX 123   деть жу           деть
SFX 123   аться утся         рваться
SFX 123   аться утся         осаться
SFX 123   аться усь          рваться
SFX 123   аться усь          осаться
SFX 123   аться ятся         спаться
SFX 123   аться люсь         спаться
SFX 123   аться ишься        жаться
SFX 123   аться ишься        спаться
SFX 123   аться ится         жаться
SFX 123   аться ится         спаться
SFX 123   аться итесь        жаться
SFX 123   аться итесь        спаться
SFX 123   аться имся         жаться
SFX 123   аться имся         спаться
SFX 123   аться ешься        рваться
SFX 123   аться ешься        осаться
SFX 123   аться ется         рваться
SFX 123   аться ется         осаться
SFX 123   аться етесь        рваться
SFX 123   аться етесь        осаться
SFX 123   аться емся         рваться
SFX 123   аться емся         осаться
SFX 123   аться ёшься        рваться
SFX 123   аться ёшься        осаться
SFX 123   аться ётся         рваться
SFX 123   аться ётся         осаться
SFX 123   аться ётесь        рваться
SFX 123   аться ётесь        осаться
SFX 123   аться ёмся         рваться
SFX 123   аться ёмся         осаться
SFX 123   ать  ут           рвать
SFX 123   ать  ут           осать
SFX 123   ать  у            рвать
SFX 123   ать  у            осать
SFX 123   ать  ят           спать
SFX 123   ать  лю           спать
SFX 123   ать  ишь          жать
SFX 123   ать  ишь          спать
SFX 123   ать  ите          жать
SFX 123   ать  ите          спать
SFX 123   ать  ит           жать
SFX 123   ать  ит           спать
SFX 123   ать  им           жать
SFX 123   ать  им           спать
SFX 123   ать  ешь          рвать
SFX 123   ать  ешь          осать
SFX 123   ать  ете          рвать
SFX 123   ать  ете          осать
SFX 123   ать  ет           рвать
SFX 123   ать  ет           осать
SFX 123   ать  ем           рвать
SFX 123   ать  ем           осать
SFX 123   ать  ёшь          рвать
SFX 123   ать  ёшь          осать
SFX 123   ать  ёте          рвать
SFX 123   ать  ёте          осать
SFX 123   ать  ёт           рвать
SFX 123   ать  ёт           осать
SFX 123   ать  ём           рвать
SFX 123   ать  ём           осать
